Illinois, session 104th, SB1041.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children's Mental Health Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 49/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Children's Mental Health Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-899, eff. 1-1-23.)